st.aff
FLAG long
SFX pN Y 43
SFX pN valoir valoir/ valoir # po:infi
SFX pN valoir valant/ valoir # po:ppre
SFX pN valoir vaux/ valoir # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pN valoir vaut/ valoir # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX pN valoir valons/ valoir # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX pN valoir valez/ valoir # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX pN valoir valent/ quivaloir # po:ipre po:3pl
SFX pN valoir valent/ révaloir # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX pN valoir valais/ valoir # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pN valoir valait/ valoir # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX pN valoir valions/ valoir # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX pN valoir valiez/ valoir # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX pN valoir valaient/ valoir # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX pN valoir valus/ valoir # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pN valoir valut/ valoir # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX pN valoir valûmes/ valoir # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX pN valoir valûtes/ valoir # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX pN valoir valurent/ valoir # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX pN valoir vaudrai/ valoir # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pN valoir vaudras/ valoir # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pN valoir vaudra/ valoir # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pN valoir vaudrons/ valoir # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pN valoir vaudrez/ valoir # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pN valoir vaudront/ valoir # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pN valoir vaudrais/ valoir # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pN valoir vaudrait/ valoir # po:cond po:3sg
SFX pN valoir vaudrions/ valoir # po:cond po:1pl
SFX pN valoir vaudriez/ valoir # po:cond po:2pl
SFX pN valoir vaudraient/ valoir # po:cond po:3pl
SFX pN valoir vaille/ quivaloir # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pN valoir vale/ révaloir # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX pN valoir vailles/ quivaloir # po:spre po:2sg
SFX pN valoir vales/ révaloir # po:spre po:2sg
SFX pN valoir vaillent/ quivaloir # po:spre po:3pl
SFX pN valoir valusse/ valoir # po:simp po:1sg
SFX pN valoir valusses/ valoir # po:simp po:2sg
SFX pN valoir valût/ valoir # po:simp po:3sg
SFX pN valoir valussions/ valoir # po:simp po:1pl
SFX pN valoir valussiez/ valoir # po:simp po:2pl
SFX pN valoir valussent/ valoir # po:simp po:3pl
SFX pN valoir vaux/ valoir # po:impe po:2sg
SFX pN valoir valons/ valoir # po:impe po:1pl
SFX pN valoir valez/ valoir # po:impe po:2pl

SFX pO Y 17
SFX pO valoir valoir/ revaloir # po:infi
SFX pO valoir valant/ revaloir # po:ppre
SFX pO valoir valu/ revaloir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX pO valoir valus/ revaloir # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX pO valoir value/ revaloir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pO valoir values/ revaloir # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pO valoir vaudrai/ revaloir # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX pO valoir vaudras/ revaloir # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX pO valoir vaudra/ revaloir # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX pO valoir vaudrons/ revaloir # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX pO valoir vaudrez/ revaloir # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX pO valoir vaudront/ revaloir # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX pO valoir vaudrais/ revaloir # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX pO valoir vaudrait/ revaloir # po:cond po:3sg
SFX pO valoir vaudrions/ revaloir # po:cond po:1pl
SFX pO valoir vaudriez/ revaloir # po:cond po:2pl
SFX pO valoir vaudraient/ revaloir # po:cond po:3pl

SFX pP Y 2
SFX pP paroir paroir/ comparoir # po:infi
SFX pP paroir parant/ comparoir # po:ppre

SFX pQ Y 2
SFX pQ haloir haloir/ chaloir # po:infi
SFX pQ haloir haut/ chaloir # po:ipre po:3sg

SFX pR Y 2
SFX pR pparoir pparoir/ apparoir # po:infi
SFX pR pparoir ppert/ apparoir # po:ipre po:3sg
