st.dic
apparoir/pR  # po:v3_i______
chaloir/pQ  # po:v3_i______
comparoir/pP  # po:v3_i_____a
équivaloir/pNq.  # po:v3___nx__a
prévaloir/pNq+  # po:v3_i__q__a
revaloir/pO  # po:v3__t____a
